dictsource/nl_rules
.group l
             l            l
          l) l
          &) lijk (_S4    l@k
          &) lijke (_S5   l@k@
          &) lijken (_S6  l@k@n
          &) lijker (_S6  l@k@r
          &) lijkere (_S7  l@k@r@
          &) lijkheid (_S8 l@khEIt
          &) lijkst (_S6  l@kst
          &) lijkste (_S7  l@kst@
          &) laan (_S4    la:n
          _) lange (@P5   laN@
          @) loog (_      lo:x
          @) loos (_S4    lo:s
          @) loze (_S4    lo:z@
          @) lozen (_S5   lo:z@n



.group m
             m            m
          m) m

            management    ma:nIdZm@nt
         _) mee (@P3      m'e:
            menu (_       m@ny
         _) mi (s@        m%I
         _) mis (anC      miz
         _) mis (commP3   m'Is
         _) mis (daP3     m'Is
         _) mis (è        miz
         _) mis (g@P3     m'Is
         _) mis (ge@P3    m'Is
         _) mis (gun      m%Is
         _) mis (in@P3    m'Is
         _) mis (kleuP3   m'Is
         _) mis (liepP3   m'Is
         _) mis (loP3     m'Is
         _) mis (tA       m'Is
         _) misver (@     m'Isf@r

.group n
             n            n
          n) n
             ng           N
             nj           n^
             n (k         N
             n (g$w_alt3  n
             n (k$w_alt3  n

          _) na (C@@P2    n'a:
          _) na (C@N      n'a:
          _) na (C%       nA
          _) na (cht      nA
          _) narci (s     n%ArsI
          _) na (rc       n%A
          _) na (der      na:
          _) na (tion     na:
          _) nano (@P4    n'a:no:
          _) na (polA     n%a:
             napoleon     n%a:po:l@jOn
          _) natuur       na:t'yr
             na (tur      n%a:
             na (vig      n%a:
          _) na (vr       na:
          _) na (volg@    n%a:
          _) noord (@P5   no:rd
          _) nieuws (@P6  n'iws
         @@) nis (_S3    nIs
         @@) nisen (_S5  nIs@n


.group o
             o            o:
             o (CK        O
             o (x         O
             o (r         o:
             oo (r        O:     // ?? or just for word-final "oor" ?
             ooi          o:j
             oo           o:
             oe           u
             oei          uj
             ou           VU
             ouw          VU
             ou (rage     u

        @@C) o (_         =o:
             obsc (u      opsk
             oe (X_       'u
             oir (_       'v#a:r
         pl) oi (t        v#A
          c) oi (ffu      v#A
         pr) o (gram      o:
          _) on (@P2      %On
             oo (X        'o:
             oon          'o:n  // in compounds, eg. telefoongesprek
             oo (C_       'o:
          _) oost (@P4    o:st
          _) op (@@P2     'Op
          _) open (@P4    'o:p@n
          _) openings (P8 'o:p@nINs
          _) op (era      'o:p
          _) op (tion     Op
             ou (che_     u
             ouch (en_    uS
          d) ou (blu      u
          c) ou (pu       u
         tr) ou (vail     u
             ouve (rtu    uvE
          _) over (@P4    ,o:v@r
           t) ou  (r          u:


.group on
          _) onaan (@P5   On'a:n
          _) onder (@P5   'Ond@r
          _) onge (@P4    ,OnQ@
          _) ont (@P3     Ont
          _) on (te@P2    On        // onterecht
          _) onder        Ond@r

          _) ong (aarn    ,OnQ'
          _) ong (ans     ,OnQ'
          _) ong (rijpbaar  ,OnQ'
          _) ong (rond    ,OnQ'
          _) ong (unstig  ,OnQ'
          _) ong (uur     ,OnQ'

          _) onge (diert  OnQ@   // stress on 'on', not after 'ge'
          _) onge (loof   OnQ@
          _) onge (luk    OnQ@
          _) onge (mak    OnQ@
          _) onge (nade   OnQ@
          _) onge (rief   OnQ@
          _) onge (val    OnQ@



.group p
             p            p
          p) p
          _) ph           f
             ph (K        f

             parach (ut   p,a:ra:S
          _) politie (@   po:l'itsi
          _) politiek     po:lit'ik
          @)  programma (_S7    o:QrAmma



.group q
             q            k
             qu           kv
          @) qu (eer      k
          @) qu (eren_    k
          @) que (_       k


.group r
             r            r
          A) r (A         r
          C) r (A         r
             rr          *r

             recherch     r@SErS
             revanch      r@vA~nS
             route        rut@  // route(s)

.group re
          _) re (geren    r@
          _) re (geer     r@
          _) re (cent     r@
          _) re (cept     r@
          _) re (ceptief  re:
          _) re (clam     r@
          _) re (serve_   r@
          _) re (cord     re'
             repre (saill re:pre:


.group s
             s            s
             s (s
          A) s (A         z
             s (b         z
             s (d         z
             sc           s
             sch          sx
             sch (_       s
             sch (e_      s
          _) sch (n       S
          _) sh           S
             sh (K        S
             sj           S
          @) sje (_       sj@
          @) s (_S1       s

             sc (oop      sk
             sc (opi      sk
          &) sel (_       =s@l
          &) selen (_     =s@l@n
          @) si (o        S
          A) si (o        Z
          @) ssi (o       S

          _) standaard (@P9 st'Anda:rt
          @) straat (_S6 stra:t
       _vre) s (e         s


.group t
             t            t
             td           t
          t) t
             tie (_       =tsi
          c) tie (_       =si
          k) tie (_       =si
          p) tie (_       =si
          s) tie (_       =ti
        cra) tie (_       ts'i
             tiee (l_     S'e:
             tië (le_     S'e:
          @) ti (a        S
          @) ti (eus      S
          @) ti (euz      S
          @) ti (ë        S
          @) ti (on       S
          s) t (i++       t
             tj           t;
             tsj          tS
          _) th           t
             th           t
             t (haar      t        // th is not [t]
             t (hav       t
          _) toe (@P3     t'u

          _) team         t'i:m
             team (_      ti:m
             touch (e     tuS
          _) train        tre:n
          _) trans (@P5   tr,Ans

.group te
          _) tegen (P5    t'e:Q@n
          _) terug (P5    t@r'8x
          _) te (gelijkP2   t@
          _) te (gemoetP2 t@
          _) te (goed     t@
          _) te (hui      t@        // tehuis
          _) te (keer     t@
          _) te (kort     t@
          _) te (leur     t@
          _) te (loor     t@
          _) te (meer     t@
          _) te (midd     t@        // temidden
          _) te (na       t@
          _) te (neer     t@
          _) te (recht    t@
          _) te (sam      t@        // tesamen
          _) te (veel     t@
          _) te (vergeefP2  t@
          _) te (werk     t@
          _) te (voorschijn t@
          _) te (vor      t@        // tevoren
          _) te (vred     t@        // tevreden
          _) teweeg (P6   t@v#'e:x


.group u
             u            y
             u (CK        8
             u (x         8
             uu           y
             ui           Wy
             uw           yU
             uw (_        yU

          _) uit (@P3      'Wyt
             u (sie_      'y
          @) ute (_       'yt
             uu (r_       'y


.group v
             v            v
          s) v            f

          _) van (@P3     v%An
          _) vanzelf (@P7 vAnz,Elf
          _) vang         vAN
          _) ver (@P3     v@r
          _) ver (sie_    vEr
          _) verder       vErd@r
          _) verge (le    v@rQ'e:
          _) voort (@P5   v'O:rt


.group w
             w            v#
             w (X         w
             w (CK        w

          _) wan (@P3     v#'An
          _) wan (L01@P3  v#'AN
          _) wan (del     v#An
          _) wanhopig     v#Anh'o:p@Q
          _) wan (kel     v#AN
          _) wann (eer    v#An
          _) wanordelijk  v#An_|'Ord@l@k
          _) wansmakelijk v#Ansm'a:k@l@k
          _) wanstaltig   v#Anst'Alt@Q
          _) wantrouwig   v#Antr'VU@Q
          _) wanvoeglijk  v#Anv'uxl@k
          _) weg (@P3     v#'EQ
          _) weg (en      v#e:Q
          _) weg (e_      v#e:Q  // bewegelijk
          _) west (@P4    v#Est
          _) wr           vr


.group x
             x            ks


.group y
             y            i
             y (CK        I
             y (x         I
          _) y (A         j


.group z
             z            z
             z (z
          s) z

             zele (_S4   ze:l@ // common suffix for cities.
          @) zelf (_S4   s'Elf
          _) zoge (@P4    z,og@
          _) zuid (@P4    zWyt


.group
            é             e:
            é (_         'e:
           éé            e:
            ère (_        'Er@
            $             d'OlAr
            , (D          k'Oma:
        __) - (_D         m'In
         @) 's (_S2       s

      erie) ën (_S2       @n
 
